Indiana, session 2026, HB1126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-17-12-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 for the provision of grants under this chapter. Subject to
subsection (b), the rules adopted under this section must address the
following:
(1) Uniform need determination procedures.
(2) Eligibility criteria, including income eligibility standards,
asset limit eligibility standards, and other standards concerning
when assistance may be provided. which shall be based on the
financial need of the applicant regardless of the applicant's
income or assets.
(3) Application procedures.
(4) Selection procedures.
(5) A consideration of the extent to which an individual has used
assistance available from other assistance programs before
assistance may be provided to the individual from the fund.
2026 IN 1126—LS 6573/DI 134


(6) Other areas in which the commission determines that rules are
necessary to ensure the uniform administration of the grant
program under this chapter.
(b) The following apply to grants awarded under this chapter:
(1) The income eligibility standards must be based on the federal
gross income of the qualified service member and the qualified
service member's spouse.
(2) (1) An employee of the department who is otherwise eligible
for a grant from the fund must submit the employee's application
directly to the commission for review. The department shall have
no influence in any part of the employee's application.
(3) (2) The maximum amount a qualified service member may
receive from the fund is two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500), unless a higher amount is approved by the commission.
(4) (3) The commission may consider the following in its analysis
of the applicant's request for assistance in excess of two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500):
(A) The department's eligibility determination of the applicant.
(B) Subject to subsection (a)(2), facts considered in the
department's need determination review and award under 915
IAC 3-6-3 and 915 IAC 3-6-5.
(C) The circumstances surrounding the applicant's hardship,
if applicable.
(D) Subject to subsection (a)(2), any substantive changes in
the applicant's financial situation after the original application
was submitted.
(E) Facts that may have been unknown or unavailable at the
time of the applicant's original application for assistance.
(F) Other compelling circumstances that may justify assistance
in excess of the two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500)
threshold.
(5) (4) The commission shall approve or deny within sixty (60)
days an application for a grant filed with the commission after
June 30, 2019, by an employee of the department. The
commission shall return an incomplete application with a notation
as to omissions. The return of an incomplete application shall be
without prejudice.
2026 IN 1126—LS 6573/DI 134